Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-120
Arrest; peace officer; duties; conditions of release.

A peace officer making an arrest pursuant to section 26-119 shall take such person into custody and take such person before a judge of the county court or the court which issued the protection order or other order. At such time the court shall establish the conditions of such person's release from custody, including the determination of bond or recognizance, as the case may be. The court shall issue an order directing that such person shall have no contact with any person protected by such order.

Laws 1989, LB 330, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 42-929;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 20.